Florida, session 2026, HB585.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (c) through (i) of subsection (7) of
section 627.748, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (d) through (j), respectively, paragraph (a) and
present paragraphs (c), (d), and (h) are amended, and a new
paragraph (c) is added to that subsection, to read:
627.748 Transportation network companies.—
(7) TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND TNC DRIVER
INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS.—
(a) Beginning July 1, 2026 2017, a TNC driver or a TNC on
behalf of the TNC driver shall maintain primary automobile
insurance that:
1. Recognizes that the TNC driver is a TNC driver or
otherwise uses a vehicle to transport riders for compensation;
and
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb585-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 585 2026
2. Covers the TNC driver while the TNC driver is logged on
to the digital network of the TNC or while the TNC driver is
engaged in a prearranged ride.
(c) The following automobile insurance requirements apply
while a participating TNC driver has accepted a prearranged ride
but a rider does not occupy the TNC vehicle:
1. Automobile insurance that provides:
a. A primary automobile liability coverage of at least
$50,000 for death and bodily injury per person, $100,000 for
death and bodily injury per incident, and $25,000 for property
damage;
b. Personal injury protection benefits that meet the
minimum coverage amounts required under ss. 627.730-627.7405;
and
c. Uninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required
by s. 627.727.
2. The coverage requirements of this paragraph may be
satisfied by any of the following:
a. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or
the TNC vehicle owner;
b. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or
c. A combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b.
(d)(c) The following automobile insurance requirements
apply while a TNC driver is engaged in a prearranged ride and a
rider occupies the TNC vehicle:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb585-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 585 2026
1. Automobile insurance that provides:
a. A primary automobile liability coverage of at least $1
million for death, bodily injury, and property damage;
b. Personal injury protection benefits that meet the
minimum coverage amounts required of a limousine under ss.
627.730-627.7405; and
c. Uninsured and underinsured vehicle coverage as required
by s. 627.727.
2. The coverage requirements of this paragraph may be
satisfied by any of the following:
a. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC driver or
the TNC vehicle owner;
b. Automobile insurance maintained by the TNC; or
c. A combination of sub-subparagraphs a. and b.
(e)(d) The TNC shall maintain the required coverage under
paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) unless the driver maintains a
policy that does not exclude, pursuant to subsection (8), the
required coverage under paragraph (b), paragraph (c), or
paragraph (d). If the insurance maintained by the TNC driver TNC
driver's insurance under paragraph (b), or paragraph (c), or
paragraph (d) lapses, has lapsed or does not provide the
required coverage, the insurance maintained by the TNC must
provide the coverage required under this subsection, beginning
with the first dollar of a claim, and have the duty to defend
such claim.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb585-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 585 2026
(i)(h) A TNC driver shall carry proof of coverage
satisfying paragraphs (b), and (c), and (d) with him or her at
all times during his or her use of a TNC vehicle in connection
with a digital network. In the event of an accident, a TNC
driver shall provide this insurance coverage information to any
party directly involved in the accident or the party's
designated representative, automobile insurers, and
investigating police officers. Proof of financial responsibility
may be presented through an electronic device, such as a digital
phone application, under s. 316.646. Upon request, a TNC driver
shall also disclose to any party directly involved in the
accident or the party's designated representative, automobile
insurers, and investigating police officers whether he or she
was logged on to a digital network or was engaged in a
prearranged ride at the time of the accident.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb585-00